test/src/gt-desc-yamls/verbDES_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Verbs that have a subform.

Tests:
  Verb - luohtedit: # JÅRGESTIT_IV, , Err/Orth
    luohtedit+V+IV+Inf: [luohtedit, luohttedit]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Sup: [luohtedittjat, luohttedittjat]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ger: [luohtedattijn, luohttedattijn]
    luohtedit+V+IV+PrfPrc: [luohtedam, luohttedam]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: [luohtedime, luohttedime, luohttedimen, luohtedimen]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: [luohtedimes, luohttedimes]
    luohtedit+V+IV+VAbess: [luohtedik, luohttedik]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [luohtedav, luohttedav]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [luohteda, luohtteda]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [luohtet, luohttet]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [luohtedin, luohttedin]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [luohtedihppe, luohttedihppe]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: [luohtedibá, luohttedibá]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [luohtedip, luohttedip]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [luohtedihpit, luohttedihpit]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [luohtedi, luohttedi]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [luohtediv, luohttediv]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [luohtedi, luohttedi]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [luohtedij, luohttedij]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [luohtedijma, luohttedijma, luohttedijme, luohtedijme] 
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [luohtedijda, luohttedijda, luohtedijde, luohttedijde]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [luohtedijga, luohttedijga]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [luohtedijma, luohttedijma, luohttedijme, luohtedijme]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [luohtedijda, luohttedijda, luohtedijde, luohttedijde]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [luohtedin, luohttedin]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: [luohteda, luohtteda]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: [luohtedis, luohttedis]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: [luohtedinno, luohttedinno]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [luohtedihtte, luohttedihtte]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: [luohtediska, luohttediska]
    luohtedit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: [luohtedup, luohttedup]
    luohtedit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: [luohteduhtut, luohtteduhtut]
    luohtedit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: [luohtedusá, luohttedusá]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: [luohtedittjav, luohttedittjav]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: [luohtedittja, luohttedittja]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: [luohtedisj, luohttedisj]
    luohtedit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: [luohtedittji, luohttedittji]
    
  Verb - etterisolierit: # ABBONERE_TV, Err/Lex
    etterisolierit+V+TV+Inf: [etterisolierit, etterisolerit]
    etterisolierit+V+TV+PrfPrc: [etterisolierim, etterisolerim]
    etterisolierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [etterisolieriv, etterisoleriv]
    etterisolierit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [etterisolieri, etterisoleri]
    etterisolierit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [etterisolierijga, etterisolerijga]
    etterisolierit+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: [etterisolierisj, etterisolerisj]
  
  Verb - liehket: # LIEHKET, 
    liehket+V+IV+Inf: liehket
    liehket+V+IV+PrfPrc: [læhkám, lähkám]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1+v1: lav
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2+v1: la
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: lijga
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: [lisj, lesj]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Gram/SentInit: [lev, læv, läv]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Gram/SentInit: [le, læ, lä]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2+Gram/SentInit: [læhppe, lähppe]
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1+Gram/SentInit: [lejma, lejme, lijme]
    liehket+V+IV+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [illa, ille, illæ, illä]
